test/src/gt-norm-yamls/FleetingVow_Nouns_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - любовь M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      любовь+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Nom: любовь
      любовь+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Acc: любовь
      любовь+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Gen: любви
      любовь+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Loc: любви
      любовь+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Dat: любви
      любовь+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Ins: любовью
      любовь+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Nom: любви
      любовь+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Acc: любви
      любовь+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen: любвей
      любовь+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Loc: любвях
      любовь+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Dat: любвям
      любовь+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Ins: любвями
  Noun - башня M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      башня+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Nom: башня
      башня+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Acc: башню
      башня+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Gen: башни
      башня+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Loc: башне
      башня+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Dat: башне
      башня+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Ins: башней
      башня+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Nom: башни
      башня+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Acc: башни
      башня+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen: башен
      башня+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Loc: башнях
      башня+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Dat: башням
      башня+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Ins: башнями
  Noun - копейка M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      копейка+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Nom: копейка
      копейка+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Acc: копейку
      копейка+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Gen: копейки
      копейка+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Loc: копейке
      копейка+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Dat: копейке
      копейка+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Ins: копейкой
      копейка+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Nom: копейки
      копейка+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Acc: копейки
      копейка+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen: копеек
      копейка+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Loc: копейках
      копейка+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Dat: копейкам
      копейка+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Ins: копейками
  Noun - свадьба M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      свадьба+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Nom: свадьба
      свадьба+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Acc: свадьбу
      свадьба+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Gen: свадьбы
      свадьба+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Loc: свадьбе
      свадьба+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Dat: свадьбе
      свадьба+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Ins: свадьбой
      свадьба+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Nom: свадьбы
      свадьба+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Acc: свадьбы
      свадьба+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen: свадеб
      свадьба+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Loc: свадьбах
      свадьба+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Dat: свадьбам
      свадьба+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Ins: свадьбами
  Noun - земля M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      земля+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Nom: земля
      земля+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Acc: землю
      земля+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Gen: земли
      земля+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Loc: земле
      земля+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Dat: земле
      земля+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Ins: [землёй, землей]
      земля+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Nom: земли
      земля+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Acc: земли
      земля+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen: земель
      земля+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Loc: землях
      земля+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Dat: землям
      земля+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Ins: землями
  Noun - сестра M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      сестра+N+Fem+Anim+Sg+Nom: сестра
      сестра+N+Fem+Anim+Sg+Acc: сестру
      сестра+N+Fem+Anim+Sg+Gen: сестры
      сестра+N+Fem+Anim+Sg+Loc: сестре
      сестра+N+Fem+Anim+Sg+Dat: сестре
      сестра+N+Fem+Anim+Sg+Ins: сестрой
      сестра+N+Fem+Anim+Pl+Nom: [сёстры, сестры]
      сестра+N+Fem+Anim+Pl+Acc: [сестёр, сестер]
      сестра+N+Fem+Anim+Pl+Gen: [сестёр, сестер]
      сестра+N+Fem+Anim+Pl+Loc: [сёстрах, сестрах]
      сестра+N+Fem+Anim+Pl+Dat: [сёстрам, сестрам]
      сестра+N+Fem+Anim+Pl+Ins: [сёстрами, сестрами]
  Noun - отец M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      отец+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Nom: отец
      отец+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc: отца
      отец+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Gen: отца
      отец+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Loc: отце
      отец+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Dat: отцу
      отец+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Ins: отцом
      отец+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Nom: отцы
      отец+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Acc: отцов
      отец+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Gen: отцов
      отец+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Loc: отцах
      отец+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Dat: отцам
      отец+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Ins: отцами
  Noun - распутье M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      распутье+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Nom: распутье
      распутье+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Acc: распутье
      распутье+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Gen: распутья
      распутье+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Loc: распутье
      распутье+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Dat: распутью
      распутье+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Ins: распутьем
      распутье+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Nom: распутья
      распутье+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Acc: распутья
      распутье+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Gen: распутий
      распутье+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Loc: распутьях
      распутье+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Dat: распутьям
      распутье+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Ins: распутьями
  Noun - окно M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      окно+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Nom: окно
      окно+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Acc: окно
      окно+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Gen: окна
      окно+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Loc: окне
      окно+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Dat: окну
      окно+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Ins: окном
      окно+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Nom: окна
      окно+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Acc: окна
      окно+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Gen: окон
      окно+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Loc: окнах
      окно+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Dat: окнам
      окно+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Ins: окнами
  Noun - письмо M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      письмо+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Nom: письмо
      письмо+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Acc: письмо
      письмо+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Gen: письма
      письмо+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Loc: письме
      письмо+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Dat: письму
      письмо+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Ins: письмом
      письмо+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Nom: письма
      письмо+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Acc: письма
      письмо+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Gen: писем
      письмо+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Loc: письмах
      письмо+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Dat: письмам
      письмо+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Ins: письмами
  Noun - яйцо M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      яйцо+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Nom: яйцо
      яйцо+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Acc: яйцо
      яйцо+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Gen: яйца
      яйцо+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Loc: яйце
      яйцо+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Dat: яйцу
      яйцо+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Ins: яйцом
      яйцо+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Nom: яйца
      яйцо+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Acc: яйца
      яйцо+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Gen: яиц
      яйцо+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Loc: яйцах
      яйцо+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Dat: яйцам
      яйцо+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Ins: яйцами
  Noun - сердце M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      сердце+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Nom: сердце
      сердце+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Acc: сердце
      сердце+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Gen: сердца
      сердце+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Loc: сердце
      сердце+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Dat: сердцу
      сердце+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Ins: сердцем
      сердце+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Nom: сердца
      сердце+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Acc: сердца
      сердце+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Gen: сердец
      сердце+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Loc: сердцах
      сердце+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Dat: сердцам
      сердце+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Ins: сердцами
